Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Legislative Lobbying

6.801.
Legislative findings and declarations relating to legislative lobbying.

The General Assembly finds and declares the following:

The operation of open and responsible government requires the fullest opportunity to be afforded to the people to petition their government for the redress of grievances and to express freely their opinions on executive and legislative action.

The identity and expenditures of certain persons who attempt to influence executive and legislative actions should be publicly identified and regulated to preserve and maintain the integrity of government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 25, effective September 16, 1993.

6.805.
Board of Ethics authorized to inquire into violations of KRS 6.760 to 6.800. [Repealed.]

6.807.
Registration statements for legislative agents — Penalties.

Each legislative agent and employer, within seven (7) days following engagement of a legislative agent, shall file with the commission an initial registration statement listing the following:

The name, business address and telephone number, and occupation of the legislative agent;

The name, brief description of the nature of the business, nature and identity of the organized association, coalition, or public interest entity, business address and telephone number of the employer, and the real party in interest on whose behalf the legislative agent is lobbying, if it is different from the employer. For the purposes of this section, if a trade association or other charitable or fraternal organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is the employer, the statement shall not list the names and addresses of each member of the association or organization, if the association or organization itself is listed;

The name, bill number, or a brief description of the legislative action for which the legislative agent is or will be engaged in lobbying on behalf of their employer or as a representative of the organized association, coalition, or public interest entity;

The date on which the legislative agent was engaged; and

Certification by the employer and legislative agent that the information contained in the registration statement is complete and accurate.

The registration shall be valid through the next thirty-first day of December of an odd-numbered year, unless previously terminated.

In addition to the initial registration statement required by subsection (1) of this section, each legislative agent and employer shall file an updated registration statement with the commission to be received by the commission, not later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth day of January, February, March, April, May, and September of each year, for the period since the end of the period covered by the previous report until the last day of the month preceding the filing date. The commission may grant a reasonable extension of time for filing the updated registration statement for good cause shown.

The updated registration statement shall confirm the continuing existence of each engagement described in an initial registration statement, and list the specific bills or resolutions on which the agent lobbied under that engagement during the period covered by the updated statement. Any statement of expenditures required to be filed by KRS

6.821

and any details of financial transactions required to be filed by KRS

6.824

shall be filed with the updated registration statement.

If a legislative agent is engaged by more than one employer, the agent shall file a separate initial and updated registration statement for each engagement. If an employer engages more than one (1) legislative agent, the employer shall file only one (1) updated registration statement under subsection (3) of this section, which shall contain the information required by subsection (3) of this section regarding all legislative agents engaged by the employer.

A change in any information required by subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section shall be reflected in the next updated registration statement filed under subsection (3) of this section.

Within thirty (30) days after the termination of an engagement, the legislative agent who was employed under the engagement shall file written notice of the termination with the commission.

If the termination of a legislative agent leaves an employer without the engagement of any legislative agents, within thirty (30) days after the termination, the employer shall file written notice with the commission of its intent to terminate its current registration.

Upon registration pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the legislative agent shall be issued a card by the commission, showing that the legislative agent is registered. The registration card shall be valid from the date of its issuance through the next thirty-first day of December of an odd-numbered year.

Any legislative agent or employer who fails to file the initial registration statement or updated registration statement, or who fails to remedy a deficiency in any filing in a timely manner, may be fined by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) without the necessity of a complaint being filed, notwithstanding KRS 6.686(1)(a), but only after notice has been given to the alleged violator of the intent of the commission to impose a fine, including the amount of the fine, and an opportunity has been afforded the alleged violator to appear before the commission or otherwise offer evidence as he may choose in mitigation of the imposition of the fine.

Any legislative agent or employer who intentionally fails to register shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 27, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 211, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 493, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 140, § 1, effective March 20, 2001.

6.809.
Registration fee — Trust and agency account.

Each employer of one (1) or more legislative agents shall pay a registration fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to the commission.

All fees collected by the commission under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a trust and agency fund account to the credit of the commission. These agency funds shall be used to supplement general fund appropriations to the commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 28, effective September 16, 1993.

6.810.
Board of Ethics established — Membership — Chairman — Compensation and expenses. [Repealed.]

6.811.
Prohibitions against certain conduct by legislative agents and their employers — Penalties.

A legislative agent or employer shall not knowingly fail to register, as required under KRS

6.807

.

A legislative agent or employer shall not knowingly fail to keep a receipt or maintain a record which KRS

6.821

requires the person to keep or maintain.

A person shall not knowingly fail to file a statement that KRS

6.807

,

6.821

, or

6.824

requires the person to file.

A legislative agent or employer shall not knowingly offer, give, or agree to give anything of value to a legislator, a candidate, or the spouse or child of a legislator or candidate.

A legislative agent shall not serve as a campaign treasurer, and shall not directly solicit, control, or deliver a campaign contribution, for a candidate or legislator.

A legislative agent shall not make a campaign contribution to a legislator, a candidate, or his or her campaign committee.

During a regular session of the General Assembly, an employer of a legislative agent shall not make a campaign contribution to a legislator, candidate, campaign committee for a legislator or candidate, or caucus campaign committee. This subsection shall not apply to candidates for the General Assembly in a special election held during a regular session of the General Assembly.

An employer shall not knowingly employ, appoint, or retain a serving legislator or former legislator as a legislative agent until at least two (2) years have elapsed from the date on which he or she vacated his or her office.

No person shall engage any person to lobby in exchange for compensation that is contingent in any way upon the passage, modification, or defeat of any legislation. No person shall accept any engagement to lobby in exchange for compensation that is contingent in any way upon the passage, modification, or defeat of any legislation. Violation of this provision is a Class D felony.

A legislative agent or other lobbyist shall not go upon the floor of either house of the General Assembly while the house is in session, except upon invitation of that house. Violation of this provision is a Class B misdemeanor.

If any legislative agent or employer violates any provision in subsections (4) to (8) of this section, he or she shall for the first violation be guilty of ethical misconduct. For the second and each subsequent violation, he or she shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 26, effective September 16, 1993; 2014, ch. 75, § 6, effective July 15, 2014.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

6.815.
Board to employ staff and fix duties and compensation. [Repealed.]

6.820.
Functions, powers and duties of board. [Repealed.]

6.821.
Statements of expenditures — Penalties.

With the updated registration statement required by KRS 6.807(3), each legislative agent, or representative of an organized association, coalition, or public interest entity, and each employer shall file a statement of expenditures as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section. A representative of an organized association, coalition, or public interest entity shall identify the source of the entity or association’s funds and financial resources. A legislative agent shall file a separate statement of expenditures for each employer engaging him.

If an employer or any legislative agent whom he or she engaged made expenditures, either separately or in combination with each other, either directly or indirectly, for food, beverages, or the costs of admittance or attendance, lodging, or other expenses related to events conducted or approved under KRS 6.611(2)(b)8., 11., or 12. on behalf of any particular member of the General Assembly or candidate, or his or her immediate family, the employer or legislative agent shall also state the following:

The name of the legislator, candidate, or member of his or her immediate family on whose behalf the expenditures were made;

The total amount of the expenditures made;

A description of the expenditures made; and

The date and specific location of the event for which the expenditures were made.

In addition to the information required by subsection (2) of this section, a statement filed by a legislative agent shall show:

The total amount of lobbying expenditures made by the legislative agent during the reporting period covered by the statement, including any expenditures for events conducted or approved under KRS 6.611(2)(b)8., 11., or 12., if the expenditures are not reimbursed by the employer; and

Expenditures made by the legislative agent for informational, educational, or promotional items or activities, and other expenses directly associated with the legislative agent’s lobbying activities during the reporting period, if the expenditures were not reimbursed by the employer.

In addition to the information required by subsection (2) of this section, a statement filed by an employer shall list:

The total amount of lobbying-related expenditures made by the employer filing the statement during the period covered by the statement;

A complete and itemized account of all amounts expended for receptions or other events conducted or approved under KRS 6.611(2)(b)8., 11., or 12., including the date and specific location of the event and the name of the group of public servants invited to the event;

A complete and itemized account of all other amounts expended for lobbying, including reimbursements paid to any legislative agent;

The compensation earned by each legislative agent, prorated to reflect the time the legislative agent was engaged in lobbying during the period covered by the statement; and

The cost of advertising which appears during a session of the General Assembly, and which supports or opposes legislation, if the cost is paid by an employer or a person or organization affiliated with an employer.

As used in this subparagraph, “advertising” means statements disseminated to the public either in print, by radio or television broadcast, or by any other electronic means, including Internet or telephonic communications, and may include direct or bulk mailings of printed materials.

No employer is required to show any expenditure on a statement filed under this subsection if the expenditure is reported on a statement filed under subsection (2) of this section by a legislative agent engaged by the employer.

Any statement required to be filed under this section shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

6.807

. Each statement shall cover expenditures made during the period that ended on the last day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the statement is required to be filed.

If it is impractical or impossible for a legislative agent or employer to determine exact dollar amounts or values of expenditures, reporting of good faith estimates, based upon reasonable accounting procedures, constitutes compliance with this subsection.

All legislative agents and employers shall retain receipts or maintain records for all expenditures that are required to be reported pursuant to this section. These receipts or records shall be maintained for a period ending on the thirty-first day of December of the second calendar year after the year in which the expenditure was made.

Any legislative agent or employer who fails to file a required statement of expenditures, or who fails to remedy any deficiency in his or her filing in a timely manner may be fined by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) without the necessity of a complaint being filed, notwithstanding KRS 6.686(1)(a), but only after notice has been given to the alleged violator of the intent of the commission to impose a fine, including the amount of the fine, and an opportunity has been afforded the alleged violator to appear before the commission or otherwise offer evidence as he or she may choose in mitigation of the imposition of the fine.

Any legislative agent or employer who intentionally files a statement of expenditures which he or she knows to contain false information or to omit required information shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 29, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 211, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 493, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2014, ch. 75, § 7, effective July 15, 2014.

6.824.
Statements of financial transactions — Penalties.

Any legislative agent who has had any financial transaction with or for the benefit of any member of the General Assembly, the Governor, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any member of the staff of any of the officials listed in this subsection shall describe the details of the transaction, including the name of the official or employee, the purpose and nature of the transaction, and the date it was made or entered into, in a statement filed with the commission with the updated registration statement required by KRS

6.807

(3). The statement shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

6.807

. Each statement shall describe each financial transaction that occurred during the filing period that ended on the last day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the statement is required to be filed.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any employer who has had any financial transaction with or for the benefit of any member of the General Assembly, the Governor, the secretary of a cabinet listed in KRS

12.250

, or any member of the staff of any official listed in this subsection shall describe the details of the transaction, including the name of the official, the purpose and nature of the transaction, and the date it was made or entered into, in a statement filed with the commission with the updated registration statement required by KRS

6.807

(3). The statement shall be filed at the times specified in KRS

6.807

. Each statement shall describe each financial transaction that occurred during the filing period that ended on the last day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the statement is required to be filed.

No employer shall be required to file any statement under this section or to deliver a copy of the statement to a public official with whom or for whose benefit the transaction was made if the financial transaction to which the statement pertains is reported by a legislative agent engaged by the employer.

Any legislative agent or employer who fails to file a required statement of financial transactions, or who fails to remedy any deficiency in his filing in a timely manner, may be fined by the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, up to a maximum total fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

Any legislative agent or employer who intentionally files a statement of financial interests which he knows to contain false information or to omit required information shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 30, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.825.
Renumbered as KRS 6.631, effective September 16, 1993.

6.827.
Dispute resolution with respect to statements of expenditures and statements of financial transactions — Civil liability for false information.

An employer or legislative agent who is required to file a statement describing an expenditure or a financial transaction shall deliver a copy of the statement to the official with whom or for whose benefit the transaction was made at least ten (10) days before the date on which the statement is filed.

If a dispute arises between any member of the General Assembly or a member of the staff of the General Assembly and an employer or legislative agent with respect to an expenditure or financial transaction alleged in a statement to be filed under KRS

6.821

or

6.824

, the member, employer, or legislative agent may file a complaint with the commission. The commission shall proceed to investigate the complaint in the same manner as set out in KRS

6.686

. The commission shall notify the parties of its final decision by certified mail. If the commission decides the disputed expenditure or financial transaction should be reported, the employer or legislative agent shall include the matter in an amended statement and file the amended statement not later than ten (10) days after the employer or agent receives notice of the decision of the committee by certified mail.

An employer or legislative agent who files a false statement of expenditures or details of a financial transaction is liable in a civil action to any official or employee who sustains damage as a result of the filing or publication of the statement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 31, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Cowan, The New Age of Ethics in Kentucky Government: What Every Lawyer Should Know, Vol. 58, No. 1, Winter 1994, Ky. Bench & Bar 33.

6.829.
Commission’s duties with respect to legislative lobbying.

The commission shall review each registration statement, expenditure statement, and financial transaction statement filed with the commission, to determine whether the statement includes all the information required. If the statement does not include all the required information, or a legislative agent or employer has failed to file a registration statement, the commission shall send notification by certified mail to the person who filed the statement regarding the deficiency in the statement, or to the person who failed to file the statement regarding that failure. Any person so notified by the commission shall, not later than ten (10) days after receiving the notice, file a registration statement or an amended statement that does include all the information required.

The commission shall keep on file the statements required by KRS

6.807

,

6.821

, and

6.824

. Those statements are public records and open to public inspection, and the commission shall computerize them so that the information contained in them is readily accessible to the general public. The commission shall provide copies of the statements to the general public upon request and may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of copying each statement.

The commission shall prescribe and make available an appropriate form for filing the information required by KRS

6.807

,

6.821

, and

6.824

. The form shall contain the following notices in boldface type: “ANY PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY FILES A FALSE STATEMENT IS IN VIOLATION OF STATE LAW AND SUBJECT TO FINES AND OTHER PENALTIES.”

The commission shall publish a handbook that explains this code in clear and concise language, and make it available free of charge to members of the General Assembly, legislative agents, employers, and any other interested persons.

On or before the fifteenth day of February of each year, the commission shall, in a manner and form it determines, publish a report containing statistical information on the registration statements filed with it during the preceding year.

Any regulations promulgated by the commission to implement this code shall be adopted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 32, effective September 16, 1993.

6.849.
[Number not yet utilized.]

6.850.
Honoraria — Definitions — Annual report. [Repealed.]